Oklahoma, session 2025, SB622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 902 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24A.41 of Title 51, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby established in the Office of the Attorney


General the Public Access Counselor Unit.


B. A person whose request to inspect or copy a public record is


denied by a public body, except the Legislature and committees,


commissions, and agencies thereof, may file a request for review


with the Public Access Counselor not later than thirty (30) calendar


days after the date of the denial. The request for review shall be


in writing on a form prescribed by the Attorney General and signed


by the requester, and shall include:


1. A copy of the request for access to records; and


2. Any responses from the public body.


C. A person whose request to inspect or copy a public record


was treated by the public body as a request for a commercial purpose


may file a request for review with the Public Access Counselor for


the limited purpose of reviewing whether the public body properly


determined that the request was made for a commercial purpose.


D. A person whose request to inspect or copy a public record


has not been returned in a prompt or reasonable manner may file a


request for review with the Public Access Counselor.





Req. No. 902 Page 2


E. No person whose request to inspect or copy a public record


is made for a commercial purpose may file a request for review with


the Public Access Counselor.


F. Upon receipt of a request for review, the Public Access


Counselor shall determine whether further action is warranted. If


the Public Access Counselor determines that the alleged violation is


unfounded, they shall advise the requester and the public body, and


no further action shall be undertaken. In all other cases, the


Public Access Counselor shall forward a copy of the request for


review to the public body within seven (7) business days after


receipt and shall specify the records or other documents that the


public body shall furnish to facilitate the review. Within seven


(7) business days after receipt of the request for review, the


public body shall fully cooperate and provide a written response to


the Public Access Counselor. To the extent that records or


documents produced by a public body contain information claimed to


be confidential or exempt from disclosure under the Oklahoma Open


Records Act, the Public Access Counselor shall not further disclose


that information.


G. 1. The Attorney General shall examine the request and


response and shall issue to the public body or public official, or


both, an advisement in response to the request for review within


sixty (60) calendar days after its receipt. Additionally, the



Req. No. 902 Page 3


Attorney General shall notify the requester when the office has


completed its review.


2. Upon receipt of an advisement, the public body shall either


take necessary action promptly and reasonably to comply with the


Oklahoma Open Records Act or shall respond to the requester. If the


advisement concludes that no additional response is required, the


requester may file suit in the proper district court against the


public body of which the request was made.


3. A public body that discloses records in accordance with


advice of the Attorney General is immune from all liabilities by


reason thereof and shall not be liable for penalties under this act.


H. If the requester files suit under Section 24A.17 of Title 51


of the Oklahoma Statutes with respect to the same denial that is the


subject of a pending request for review, the requester shall notify


the Public Access Counselor, and the Public Access Counselor shall


take no further action with respect to the request for review and


shall so notify the public body.


I. The Attorney General may issue advisory opinions to advise


public bodies regarding compliance with this act. A review may be


initiated upon receipt of a written request from the head of the


public body or its attorney, which shall contain sufficient,


accurate facts from which a determination can be made. The Public


Access Counselor may request additional information from the public


body in order to assist in the review. A public body that relies in

Req. No. 902 Page 4


good faith on the advice of the Attorney General in responding to a


request is not liable for penalties under this act if the facts upon


which the advice is based have been fully and fairly disclosed to


the Public Access Counselor.


J. If the Public Access Counselor finds that a person


requesting review of an agency’s action pursuant to subsection B, C,


or D of this section has submitted multiple frivolous requests, the


Public Access Counselor may deny future requests for review.


K. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Attorney


General shall not be required to produce pursuant to Section 24A.5


of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the following:


1. Any records provided under this section to the Office of the


Attorney General by another public body;


2. Any correspondence between the Office of the Attorney


General and the public body related to advice under this section; or


3. Any work papers or product of the Office of the Attorney


General in carrying out the duties required by this section.


L. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the


Attorney General from enforcing or taking action regarding the


Oklahoma Open Records Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 18b, as last


amended by Section 170, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 18b), is amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 902 Page 5


Section 18b. A. The duties of the Attorney General as the


chief law officer of the state shall be:


1. To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all actions


and proceedings, civil or criminal, in the Supreme Court and Court


of Criminal Appeals in which the state is interested as a party;


2. To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all actions


and proceedings in any of the federal courts in which the state is


interested as a party;


3. To initiate or appear in any action in which the interests


of the state or the people of the state are at issue, or to appear


at the request of the Governor, the Legislature, or either branch


thereof, and prosecute and defend in any court or before any


commission, board or officers any cause or proceeding, civil or


criminal, in which the state may be a party or interested; and when


so appearing in any such cause or proceeding, the Attorney General


may, if the Attorney General deems it advisable and to the best


interest of the state, take and assume control of the prosecution or


defense of the state’s interest therein;


4. To consult with and advise district attorneys, when


requested by them, in all matters pertaining to the duties of their


offices, when the district attorneys shall furnish the Attorney


General with a written opinion supported by citation of authorities


upon the matter submitted;



Req. No. 902 Page 6


5. To give an opinion in writing upon all questions of law


submitted to the Attorney General by the Legislature or either


branch thereof, or by any state officer, board, commission or


department, provided, that the Attorney General shall not furnish


opinions to any but district attorneys, the Legislature or either


branch thereof, or any other state official, board, commission or


department, and to them only upon matters in which they are


officially interested;


6. At the request of the Governor, State Auditor and Inspector,


State Treasurer, or either branch of the Legislature, to prosecute


any official bond or any contract in which the state is interested,


upon a breach thereof, and to prosecute or defend for the state all


actions, civil or criminal, relating to any matter connected with


either of their Departments;


7. Whenever requested by any state officer, board or


commission, to prepare proper drafts for contracts, forms and other


writing which may be wanted for the use of the state;


8. To prepare drafts of bills and resolutions for individual


members of the Legislature upon their written request stating the


gist of the bill or resolution desired;


9. To enforce the proper application of monies appropriated by


the Legislature and to prosecute breaches of trust in the


administration of such funds;



Req. No. 902 Page 7


10. To institute actions to recover state monies illegally


expended, to recover state property and to prevent the illegal use


of any state property, upon the request of the Governor or the


Legislature;


11. To pay into the State Treasury, immediately upon its


receipt, all monies received by the Attorney General belonging to


the state;


12. To settle, compromise and dispose of an action in which the


Attorney General represents the interests of the state, so long as


the consideration negotiated for such settlement, compromise or


disposition is payable to the state or one of its agencies which is


a named party of the action and any monies, any property or other


item of value is paid first to the State Treasury;


13. To keep and file copies of all opinions, contracts, forms


and letters of the office, and to keep an index of all opinions,


contracts and forms according to subject and section of the law


construed or applied;


14. To keep a register or docket of all actions, demands and


investigations prosecuted, defended or conducted by the Attorney


General in behalf of the state. The register or docket shall give


the style of the case or investigation, where pending, court number,


office number, the gist of the matter, result and the names of the


assistants who handled the matter;



Req. No. 902 Page 8


15. To keep a complete office file of all cases and


investigations handled by the Attorney General on behalf of the


state;


16. To report to the Legislature or either branch thereof


whenever requested upon any business relating to the duties of the


Attorney General’s office;


17. To institute civil actions against members of any state


board or commission for failure of such members to perform their


duties as prescribed by the statutes and the Constitution and to


prosecute members of any state board or commission for violation of


the criminal laws of this state where such violations have occurred


in connection with the performance of such members’ official duties;


18. To respond to any request for an opinion of the Attorney


General’s office, submitted by a member of the Legislature,


regardless of subject matter, by written opinion determinative of


the law regarding such subject matter;


19. To convene multicounty grand juries in such manner and for


such purposes as provided by law; provided, such grand juries are


composed of citizens from each of the counties on a pro rata basis


by county;


20. To investigate any report by the State Auditor and


Inspector filed with the Attorney General pursuant to Section 223 of


this title and prosecute all actions, civil or criminal, relating to


such reports or any irregularities or derelictions in the management

Req. No. 902 Page 9


of public funds or property which are violations of the laws of this


state;


21. To represent and protect the collective interests of all


utility consumers of this state in rate-related proceedings before


the Corporation Commission or in any other state or federal judicial


or administrative proceeding;


22. To represent and protect the collective interests of


insurance consumers of this state in rate-related proceedings before


the Insurance Commissioner or in any other state or federal judicial


or administrative proceeding;


23. To investigate and prosecute any criminal action relating


to insurance fraud, if in the opinion of the Attorney General a


criminal prosecution is warranted, or to refer such matters to the


appropriate district attorney;


24. To monitor and evaluate any action by the federal


government including, but not limited to, executive orders by the


President of the United States, rules or regulations promulgated by


an agency of the federal government or acts of Congress to determine


if such actions are in violation of the Tenth Amendment to the


Constitution of the United States;


25. To cross-deputize police officers of the police department


of any municipality or any officer deputized by the county sheriff


or a designee subject to an interlocal governmental agreement with


the Attorney General’s Office in an effort to combine city, county,

Req. No. 902 Page 10


and state law enforcement efforts and to encourage cooperation


between city, county, and state law enforcement officials.


Liability for the conduct of any municipal police officer cross-


deputized under the terms and conditions of an interlocal


governmental agreement or any officer deputized by the county


sheriff under the terms and conditions of an interlocal governmental


agreement shall remain the responsibility of the respective employer


for that officer; and


26. To maintain data related to human trafficking and to assist


law enforcement, social service agencies, and victim services


programs in identifying and supporting victims of human trafficking;


and


27. To investigate and prosecute any civil or criminal action


relating to violations of the Oklahoma Open Records Act, Section


24A.1 et seq. of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or the Oklahoma


Open Meeting Act, Section 301 et seq. of Title 25 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, if the Attorney General determines that a civil or


criminal prosecution is warranted or to defer such matters to a


district attorney.


B. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the


Attorney General to appear and defend or prosecute in any court any


cause or proceeding for or on behalf of the Oklahoma Tax Commission,


the Board of Managers of the State Insurance Fund, or the


Commissioners of the Land Office.

Req. No. 902 Page 11


C. In all appeals from the Corporation Commission to the


Supreme Court of Oklahoma in which the state is a party, the


Attorney General shall have the right to designate counsel of the


Corporation Commission as the Attorney General’s legally appointed


representative in such appeals, and it shall be the duty of the


Corporation Commission counsel to act when so designated and to


consult and advise with the Attorney General regarding such appeals


prior to taking action therein.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-902 TEK 1/19/2025 5:40:13 AM





















Req. No. 902 Page 12